dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="/mEM__pr">
<e><p><l>mEM</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mEM</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mEMne</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mEMne</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJe</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJe</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJako</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJako</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJase</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJase</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJameM</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJameM</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJapara</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJapara</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hama</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hama</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamane</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamane</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hameM</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hameM</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamako</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamako</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamase</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamase</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamameM</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamameM</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamapara</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamapara</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>mere_liye</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere_liye</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere_xvArA</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere_xvArA</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>merA</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>hamAre_liye</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre_liye</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre_xvArA</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre_xvArA</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>hamArA</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

</pardefs>

<e lm="mEM"><i></i><par n="/mEM__pr"/></e>
